Arkansas, session 2025, HB1991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 10, Subchapter 1, is amended to
add an additional section to read as follows:
18-10-101. Fire apparatus access roads.
The Arkansas Fire Prevention Code shall not require a residential
development to maintain two (2) or more separate and approved fire apparatus
access roads if:
(1) The residential development is not located in a city
of the first class, a city of the second class, or an incorporated town; and
(2) Each lot located in the residential development is at
least one (1) acre.






*ZRC115*
04/04/2025 3:58:48 PM ZRC115